Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1722
Liability; joint and several.

(1) The act, omission, or failure of any official, agent, or other person acting for any individual, association, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or trust within the scope of his or her employment or office shall be deemed the act, omission, or failure of such individual, association, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, or trust as well as of such official, agent, or other person.

(2) Every person who directly or indirectly controls another person liable under any provision of the Commodity Code, every partner, member, officer, or director of such other person, every person occupying a similar status or performing similar functions, and every employee of such other person who materially aids in the violation shall also be liable jointly and severally with and to the same extent as such other person unless the person who is also liable by virtue of this section sustains the burden of proof that he or she did not know and in exercise of reasonable care could not have known of the existence of the facts by reason of which the liability is alleged to exist.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 22;

Laws 1993, LB 121, § 105.